Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-130.01
Beer; manufacturers and shippers; file notice; contents.

Every manufacturer or shipper of beer shall, before commencing or continuing business, file with the commission a notice in writing stating the name of the person, company, corporation, or firm, the names of the members of any such company or firm, the place of residence of such persons, a legal description of the premises on which the office of the manufacturer or shipper is situated and the title to such premises, and the name of the owner thereof.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 23, p. 388;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-323;

R.S.1943, § 53-159;

Laws 1988, LB 1089, § 21;

Laws 1989, LB 780, § 11;

R.S.Supp.,1990, § 53-159;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 33.